Nebraska, session 109, LB308.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB308 LB308
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 9 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Health Care Staffing Agency Registration Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Health Care Staffing Agency
Registration Act:
(1) Commissioner means the Commissioner of Labor;
(2) Department means the Department of Labor;
(3)(a) Direct services means services provided to consumers through
person-to-person contact; and
(b) Direct services does not mean:
(i) Services performed by an individual in a health care entity that
do not involve the provision of any direct service or treatment to a
consumer of a health care entity;
(ii) The practice of medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine
and surgery by an individual licensed under the Medicine and Surgery
Practice Act; or
(iii) The practice of nursing by a nurse practitioner licensed under
the Nurse Practitioner Practice Act;
(4) Health care entity means a health care facility or a health care
service;
(5) Health care facility has the same meaning as in section 71-413;
(6) Health care service has the same meaning as in section 71-415;
(7) Health care staffing agency means an individual, a trust, a
partnership, a corporation, a limited liability partnership, a limited
liability company, or any other business entity that provides one or more
temporary staff workers to a separate, third-party health care entity.
Health care staffing agency includes a health care technology platform;
(8) Health care technology platform means an individual, a trust, a
partnership, a corporation, a limited liability partnership, a limited
liability company, or any other business entity that developed and
operates, offers, or maintains a system or technology that provides a
marketplace, by means of the Internet or a software application, which
-2-

LB308 LB308
2025 2025
allows (a) a staff worker, as an independent contractor and in the sole
discretion of such staff worker, to choose when and how often to utilize
the platform to bid on or select an open shift posted by a health care
entity and (b) a health care entity to set rates with the platform that
can only be changed by a contractual amendment between the parties;
(9)(a) Nursing services means services that may be provided only by
or under the supervision of a nurse; and
(b) Nursing services does not mean the practice of nursing by a
nurse practitioner licensed under the Nurse Practitioner Practice Act;
and
(10) Staff worker means an individual who contracts with or is
employed by a health care staffing agency to provide direct services or
nursing services for a health care entity.
Sec. 3. (1) A health care staffing agency operating in the state
shall register annually with the department. As a condition of
eligibility for registration, the applicant shall certify that the health
care staffing agency will not enforce any noncompete clause in any
contract existing prior to registration with any health care entity or
staff worker that restricts in any manner the employment opportunities of
a staff worker.
(2) An applicant for registration and renewal of registration shall,
for each separate location at which the applicant intends to operate as a
health care staffing agency in Nebraska, file an application in a form
prescribed by the department and pay an annual registration fee of one
thousand five hundred dollars to the department, except that if the
applicant is a health care technology platform operating in Nebraska that
does not maintain a physical location in Nebraska, the application shall
be for the state generally and the annual registration fee shall be one
thousand five hundred dollars for such application. An application for
the renewal of a registration shall be made at least sixty days prior to
the expiration of the then-current registration period. The department
-3-

LB308 LB308
2025 2025
shall issue the applicant a separate certification of registration for
each location at which the applicant intends to operate as a health care
staffing agency in Nebraska upon approval of registration and payment of
the fee, except that if the applicant is a health care technology
platform operating in Nebraska that does not maintain a physical location
in Nebraska, the department shall issue one certificate of registration
to the applicant for the state generally. The application shall include
appropriate evidence of ability to comply with the requirements of
section 4 of this act. The department shall remit the fees to the State
Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.
(3) If the commissioner denies an application for registration or
renewal of registration of a health care staffing agency, the
commissioner shall issue a notice of denial. The health care staffing
agency may file an appeal with the commissioner within twenty days after
the date of mailing of the notice of denial. Except as otherwise provided
in the Health Care Staffing Agency Registration Act, an appeal under this
section shall be governed by the Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 4. (1) A health care staffing agency shall:
(a) Ensure that each staff worker complies with all applicable
requirements relating to the health requirements and qualifications for
personnel providing direct services or nursing services in a health care
entity;
(b) Document that each staff worker meets the minimum licensing,
certification, and health requirements as applicable for the staff
worker's position in the health care entity;
(c) Maintain a record for each staff worker and report, file, or
otherwise provide any required documentation to any external party or
regulator if such duties would otherwise be the responsibility of the
health care entity if the staff worker was an employee of the health care
entity. A health care technology platform shall make available records
stored on the platform for all staff workers, including documents
-4-

LB308 LB308
2025 2025
required pursuant to subdivisions (1)(b) and (d) and subsections (2) and
(3) of this section; and
(d) Maintain or require each staff worker to maintain professional
and general liability insurance coverage with minimum per occurrence
coverage of one million dollars and aggregate coverage of three million
dollars to insure against loss, damage, or expense incident to a claim
arising out of the death or injury of any individual as the result of
negligence or malpractice in the provision of services by the health care
staffing agency or a staff worker of the agency.
(2) A health care staffing agency shall submit a report to the
department on a quarterly basis, in the form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner, for each health care entity participating in medicare or
medicaid and contracting with the agency, that includes the following
information by provider type:
(a) A detailed list of the average amount charged to the health care
entity for each category of staff worker in Nebraska, including any
ancillary charges or fees; and
(b) A detailed list by licensing category of the average amount paid
by the agency to staff workers in Nebraska.
(3) A health care staffing agency shall provide the department with
(a) proof of a certificate or policy of insurance written by an insurance
carrier duly authorized to do business in this state which gives the
effective dates of workers' compensation insurance coverage indicating
that it is in force, (b) proof of a certificate evidencing approval of
self-insurance privileges as provided by the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Court pursuant to section 48-145, or (c) a signed statement
indicating that the health care staffing agency is not required to carry
workers' compensation insurance pursuant to the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Act.
(4) A health care staffing agency that ceases to engage in the
business of or act as a health care staffing agency shall notify the
-5-

LB308 LB308
2025 2025
department of such fact and maintain all files and other records relating
to its business as a health care staffing agency in Nebraska for a period
of two years. Such files and records shall be made available to the
department within seven calendar days after such files and records are
requested by the department.
Sec. 5. (1) A health care staffing agency shall not:
(a) Include in any contract with a staff worker or a health care
entity a noncompete clause restricting in any manner the employment
opportunities of a staff worker; or
(b) In any contract with a staff worker or a health care entity,
require payment of liquidated damages, employment fees, or other
compensation if the staff worker is subsequently hired as a permanent
employee of the health care entity.
(2) Any clause of a contract that violates this section is void.
Sec. 6. (1) If the commissioner determines that a health care
staffing agency (a) failed to register as required by the Health Care
Staffing Agency Registration Act, (b) violated section 4 or 5 of this
act, (c) failed to provide documentation pursuant to section 7 of this
act, or (d) knowingly provided to a health care entity a staff worker who
has an illegally or fraudulently obtained or issued diploma,
registration, license, certification, or background check, the
commissioner may take one or more of the following actions:
(i) Assess a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars for
a first offense and five thousand dollars for each offense thereafter; or
(ii) Revoke the registration for a period of one calendar year. This
revocation shall apply to all locations of the health care staffing
agency.
(2) If the commissioner determines that a civil penalty or
revocation is warranted under this section, the commissioner shall issue
a notice of citation that notifies the health care staffing agency of the
proposed civil penalty or revocation. The notice of citation shall be
-6-

LB308 LB308
2025 2025
sent by certified mail or any other manner of delivery by which the
United States Postal Service can verify delivery.
(3) A health care staffing agency may appeal any notice of citation
by filing an appeal with the commissioner within twenty days after the
date of mailing of the notice of citation. Except as otherwise provided
in the Health Care Staffing Agency Registration Act, an appeal under this
subsection shall be governed by the Administrative Procedure Act.
(4) No penalty or revocation shall become effective until the later
of the day following expiration of the appeal period or thirty days after
a decision on appeal has become final. Once a revocation becomes
effective, it is effective for one calendar year and applies to revoke
any then-current registration for all locations of the health care
staffing agency and to preclude the health care staffing agency for
applying for a new registration for any location during the revocation
period. A health care staffing agency that has substantially common
ownership or management as a health care staffing agency whose
registration has been revoked under this section shall not be eligible
for registration during the revocation period.
(5) In any civil action to enforce the Health Care Staffing Agency
Registration Act, the commissioner and the state may be represented by
any qualified attorney who is employed by the commissioner and is
designated by the commissioner for this purpose or, at the commissioner's
request, by the Attorney General.
Sec. 7. (1) The commissioner shall establish a system for the
public to report complaints against a health care staffing agency or
staff worker regarding compliance with the Health Care Staffing Agency
Registration Act. The commissioner shall investigate any complaint
received.
(2) The commissioner may investigate to determine if a health care
staffing agency is in compliance with the Health Care Staffing Agency
Registration Act and shall conduct random audits of health care staffing
-7-

LB308 LB308
2025 2025
agencies with staff workers in Nebraska. Any investigation or audit shall
take place at such times and places as the commissioner directs, with no
fewer than three business days' prior notice.
(3) For purposes of any investigation or audit under this section,
the commissioner or any officer designated by the commissioner may
administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their
attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books,
papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or
records that the commissioner deems relevant or material to the
investigation.
(4) In case of contumacy by or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to
any person, any court of competent jurisdiction, upon application by the
commissioner and determination that such refusal was not based on a
reasonable interpretation of applicable law, may issue to such person an
order requiring such person to appear before the commissioner or the
officer designated by the commissioner and produce documentary evidence,
if so ordered, or give evidence affecting the matter under investigation
or in question. Such person shall be afforded an opportunity to provide
the commissioner and, if an application is made to a court of competent
jurisdiction by the commissioner to enforce the subpoena, the court with
an analysis or argument as to why such contumacy or refusal is based on a
reasonable interpretation of applicable law. Any failure to obey the
order of the court may be punished by the court as contempt.
Sec. 8. (1) The department shall create a database of health care
staffing agencies registered under the Health Care Staffing Agency
Registration Act. The department shall make the database accessible to
the public on its website.
(2) The database shall include, but not be limited to, the following
information:
(a) The date of registration approval for the health care staffing
agency; and
-8-

LB308 LB308
2025 2025
(b) The date of expiration or revocation of the registration of the
health care staffing agency.
Sec. 9. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Health Care Staffing Agency Registration
Act.
Sec. 10. Section 81-401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-401 The Governor, through the agency of the Department of Labor
created by section 81-101, shall have power:
(1) To foster, promote, and develop the welfare of wage earners;
(2) To improve working conditions;
(3) To advance opportunities for profitable employment;
(4) To collect, collate, assort, systematize, and report statistical
details relating to all departments of labor, especially in its relation
to commercial, industrial, social, economic, and educational conditions
and to the permanent prosperity of the manufacturing and productive
industries;
(5) To acquire and distribute useful information on subjects
connected with labor in the most general and comprehensive sense of the
word;
(6) To acquire and distribute useful information concerning the
means of promoting the material, social, intellectual, and moral
prosperity of laboring men and women;
(7) To acquire and distribute information as to the conditions of
employment and such other facts as may be deemed of value to the
industrial interests of the state;
(8) To acquire and distribute information in relation to the
prevention of accidents, occupational diseases, and other related
subjects;
(9) To acquire and distribute useful information regarding the role
of the part-time labor force and the manner in which such labor force
-9-

LB308 LB308
2025 2025
affects the economy and citizens of the state; and
(10) To administer and enforce all of the provisions of the
Employment Security Law, the Farm Labor Contractors Act, the Health Care
Staffing Agency Registration Act, and the Wage and Hour Act and Chapter
48, articles 2, 3, 4, and 5, and for that purpose there is imposed upon
the Commissioner of Labor the duty of executing all of the provisions of
such acts, law, and articles.
Sec. 11. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 12. Original section 81-401, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-10-